Vermont statutes. Title 23 Motor Vehicles
Chapter 39. Commercial Driver’s License Act

§ 4101.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the Commercial Driver’s License Act.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 239

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 254.

§ 4102.
Statement of intent and purpose.

The purpose of this chapter is to implement 49 U.S.C. Chapter 313, as may be amended, and the federal Commercial Motor Vehicle Safety Act of 1986, Title XII of Pub. L. No. 99-570, as amended, and reduce or prevent commercial motor vehicle crashes, fatalities, and injuries by permitting commercial drivers to hold only one license, disqualifying commercial drivers who have committed certain criminal or other offenses or serious traffic violations, and strengthening licensing and testing standards. This chapter is a remedial law and shall be liberally construed to promote the public health, safety, and welfare. To the extent that this chapter conflicts with general operator licensing provisions, this chapter prevails. Where this chapter is silent, the general operator licensing provisions apply.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 239

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, amended

1991, No. 88

, § 3, eff. April 1, 1992;

2013, No. 20

, § 1.

§ 4103.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Commercial driver’s license” means a license issued in accordance with the requirements of this chapter to an individual that authorizes the individual to drive a class of commercial motor vehicle.

“Commercial Driver’s License Information System” means the information system established pursuant to federal law to serve as a clearinghouse for locating information related to the licensing and identification of commercial motor vehicle drivers.

“Commercial learner’s permit” means a permit issued pursuant to sections 4108 and 4110 of this title.

“Commercial motor vehicle” means a motor vehicle designed or used to transport passengers or property that:
(4) (A) “Commercial motor vehicle” means a motor vehicle designed or used to transport passengers or property that:

has either a gross vehicle weight rating or gross vehicle weight of at least 26,001 or more pounds or such lesser rating as determined by federal regulation;

is designed to transport more than 15 passengers, including the driver; or

is transporting hazardous materials and is required to be placarded in accordance with 49 C.F.R. Part 172, subpart F.

“Commercial motor vehicle” shall not include:

authorized emergency vehicles as defined in section 4 of this title;

motor homes as defined in

32 V.S.A. § 8902(11)

and trailer coaches as defined in subdivision 4(41) of this title; however, this exemption shall only apply to vehicles used strictly for recreational, noncommercial purposes;

equipment owned or operated by the U.S. Department of Defense, including the National Guard, and operated by noncivilian personnel or by National Guard military technicians (civilians who are required to wear military uniforms) and active duty U.S. Coast Guard personnel;

farm vehicles, which are vehicles:

controlled and operated by a farmer;

used to transport either agricultural products, farm machinery, farm supplies or both to or from a farm;

not used in the operations of a common or contract motor carrier; and

used within 150 miles of the farm.

[Repealed.]

“Disqualification” means:

the suspension, revocation, cancellation, or withdrawal by a state of an individual’s privilege to operate a commercial motor vehicle;

a determination by the Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration, under the rules of practice for motor carrier safety contained in 49 C.F.R. Part 386, that an individual is no longer qualified to operate commercial motor vehicles under 49 C.F.R. Part 391; or

the loss of qualification that automatically follows a testing refusal or conviction of an offense listed in 49 C.F.R. § 383.51.

“Driver” means any individual who drives, operates, or is in physical control of a commercial motor vehicle on a public highway or who is required to hold a commercial driver’s license.

“Employer” means any person, including the United States, a state, or a political subdivision of a state, who owns or leases a commercial motor vehicle or assigns an individual to drive a commercial motor vehicle.

“Foreign jurisdiction” means any jurisdiction other than a state of the United States.

“Gross vehicle weight rating” means the value specified by the manufacturer or manufacturers as the maximum loaded weight of a single or a combination vehicle. The gross vehicle weight rating of a combination vehicle is the gross vehicle weight rating of the power unit plus the gross vehicle weight rating of the towed unit or units.

“Hazardous materials” means any material that has been designated as hazardous under 49 U.S.C. § 5103 and is required to be placarded under subpart F of 49 C.F.R. Part 172 or any quantity of a material listed as a select agent or toxin in 42 C.F.R. Part 73.

“Nonresident CDL” means a commercial driver’s license issued by a state to an individual who resides in a foreign jurisdiction.

[Repealed.]

“State” means a state, territory, or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Republic of Mexico, and any Canadian province.

“United States” means the 50 states and the District of Columbia.

“Conviction” means an unvacated adjudication of guilt, or a determination by a judge or hearing officer that a person has violated or failed to comply with the law in a court of original jurisdiction or an authorized administrative tribunal, an unvacated forfeiture of bail or collateral deposited to secure the person’s appearance in court, the payment of a fine or court cost, or violation of a condition of release without bail, regardless of whether or not the penalty is rebated, suspended, or probated. Conviction shall also mean a plea of guilty or nolo contendere that has been accepted by the court.

“Serious traffic violation” means a conviction when operating a commercial motor vehicle or, if applicable, when operating a noncommercial motor vehicle when the conviction results in the revocation, cancellation, or suspension of the operator’s license or operating privilege, of:

Excessive speeding, involving a single charge of any speed 15 miles per hour or more, above the posted speed limit.

Negligent or reckless driving, as defined in section 1091 of this title.

Improper traffic lane changes, as defined in section 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, or 1038 of this title.

Following the vehicle ahead too closely, as defined in section 1039 of this title.

A violation of any state law or local ordinance relating to motor vehicle traffic control, other than a parking violation, arising in connection with a crash or collision resulting in death to any individual.

Operating a commercial motor vehicle without obtaining a commercial driver’s license.

Operating a commercial motor vehicle without a commercial driver’s license in the driver’s possession. However, no person may be found to have committed this violation if he or she provides proof to the enforcement officer who issued the traffic complaint that the individual held a commercial driver’s license valid on the date the complaint was issued.

Operating a commercial motor vehicle without the proper class of commercial driver’s license or endorsements, or both.

Texting while driving a commercial motor vehicle in violation of section 4125 of this chapter or section 1099 of this title.

Using a handheld mobile telephone while driving a commercial motor vehicle in violation of section 4125 of this chapter.

“Tank vehicle” means any commercial motor vehicle that is designed to transport any liquid or gaseous materials within a tank or tanks having an individual rated capacity of more than 119 gallons and an aggregate rated capacity of 1,000 gallons or more that is either permanently or temporarily attached to the vehicle or the chassis. A commercial motor vehicle transporting an empty storage container tank, not designed for transportation, with a rated capacity of 1,000 gallons or more that is temporarily attached to a flatbed trailer is not a tank vehicle.

“Out-of-service order” means a declaration by the Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration or an authorized enforcement officer of a federal, state, Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, Canadian, Mexican, or local jurisdiction, that a driver, or a commercial motor vehicle, or a school bus, or a motor carrier operation, is out of service.

“Imminent hazard” means the existence of a condition that presents a substantial likelihood that death, serious illness, severe personal injury, or a substantial endangerment to health, property, or the environment may occur before the reasonably foreseeable completion date of a formal proceeding begun to lessen the risk of that death, illness, injury, or endangerment.

“Medical examiner” means:

For medical examinations conducted before May 21, 2014, or before such later date as the Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration (FMCSA) may prescribe, a person who is licensed, certified, or registered in accordance with applicable state laws and rules to perform physical examinations. A “medical examiner” may include a doctor of medicine, osteopathic physician, physician assistant, advanced practice registered nurse, or chiropractic physician.

For medical examinations conducted on and after May 21, 2014, or on or after such later date as the FMCSA may prescribe, an individual certified by the FMCSA and listed on the National Registry of Certified Medical Examiners.

A person’s state of domicile is that state where a person has his or her true, fixed, and permanent home and physical residence and to which he or she has the intention of returning whenever he or she is absent.

“Mobile telephone” means a mobile communication device that falls under or uses any commercial mobile radio service, as defined under 47 C.F.R. § 20.3. “Mobile telephone” does not include two-way or Citizens Band Radio services.

“Texting” means manually entering alphanumeric text into, or reading text from, an electronic device. “Texting” includes short message service, e-mailing, instant messaging, a command or request to access a World Wide Web page, pressing more than a single button to initiate or terminate a voice communication using a mobile telephone, or engaging in any other form of electronic text retrieval or entry, for present or future communication. “Texting” does not include:

inputting, selecting, or reading information on a global positioning system or navigation system;

pressing a single button to initiate or terminate a voice communication using a mobile telephone; or

using a device capable of performing multiple functions, including fleet management systems, dispatching devices, smart phones, citizens band radios, and music players for a purpose that is not otherwise prohibited in this chapter.

“Use a hand-held mobile telephone” means:

using at least one hand to hold a mobile telephone to conduct a voice communication;

dialing or answering a mobile telephone by pressing more than a single button; or

reaching for a mobile telephone in a manner that requires a driver to maneuver so that he or she is no longer in a seated driving position and restrained by a seat belt that is installed in accordance with 49 C.F.R. § 393.93 and adjusted in accordance with the vehicle manufacturer’s instructions.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 239

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1991, No. 88

, § 4;

1991, No. 88

, §§ 5, 7, eff. June 26, 1991; 1991, No. 88, §§ 6, 8, eff. April 1, 1992;

1995, No. 84

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 1, 2, eff. Oct. 1, 1996;

1997, No. 32

, § 6;

2005, No. 37

, §§ 2, 3;

2005, No. 166

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2009, No. 152

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2013, No. 20

, § 1;

2013, No. 189

(Adj. Sess.), § 24;

2015, No. 47

, § 51;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 254;

2019, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), § 16;

2021, No. 76

, § 27.

§ 4104.
Limitation on number of driver’s licenses.

No individual who drives a commercial motor vehicle shall have more than one driver’s license.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 239

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 254.

§ 4105.
Notification required by driver.

Notification of convictions. The driver of a commercial motor vehicle shall notify the State and employers of convictions as follows:

The State. Any driver of a commercial motor vehicle holding a driver’s license issued by this State who is convicted of violating any state law or local ordinance relating to motor vehicle traffic control in any other state or federal, provincial, territorial, or municipal laws of Canada, other than parking violations, shall notify the Commissioner in the manner specified by the Commissioner within 30 days after the date of conviction.

Employers. Any driver of a commercial motor vehicle holding a driver’s license issued by this State who is convicted of violating any state law or local ordinance relating to motor vehicle traffic control in this or any other state or federal, provincial, territorial, or municipal laws of Canada, other than parking violations, shall notify his or her employer in writing of the conviction within 30 days after the date of conviction.

Notification of suspensions, revocations, and cancellations. A driver whose driver’s license is suspended, revoked, or cancelled by any state; who loses the privilege to drive a commercial motor vehicle in any state for any period; or who is disqualified from driving a commercial motor vehicle for any period shall notify his or her employer of that fact before the end of the business day following the day the driver received notice of that fact.

Notification of previous employment.

Any individual who applies to be a commercial motor vehicle driver must provide the employer, at the time of the application, with the following information for the 10 years preceding the date of application:

a list of the names and addresses of the applicant’s previous employers for which the applicant was a driver of a commercial motor vehicle;

the dates between which the applicant drove for each employer; and

the reason for leaving that employer.

The applicant must certify that all information furnished is true and complete. An employer may require an applicant to provide additional information.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 239

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 254;

2021, No. 20

, § 258.

§ 4106.
Employer responsibilities.

Each employer shall require the applicant to provide the information specified in subsection 4105(c) of this title.

No employer may knowingly allow, permit, or authorize a driver to drive a commercial motor vehicle during any period:

in which the driver has a driver’s license suspended, revoked, or cancelled by a state or has lost the privilege to drive a commercial motor vehicle in a state, or has been disqualified from driving a commercial motor vehicle; or

in which the driver has more than one driver’s license.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 239

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 254.

§ 4107.
Commercial driver’s license required.

Except when driving under a commercial learner’s permit and accompanied by the holder of a commercial driver’s license valid for the vehicle being driven, no individual may drive a commercial motor vehicle on the highways of this State unless the following conditions are met:

the individual holds a commercial driver’s license;

the individual is in immediate possession of the license; and

the license has the applicable endorsements valid for the vehicle the individual is driving.

No individual may drive a commercial motor vehicle while his or her driving privilege is suspended, revoked, or cancelled; while subject to a disqualification; or in violation of an out-of-service order.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, employees of farm-related service industries shall be exempt from the knowledge and skills tests required under this chapter and shall be issued restricted commercial driver’s licenses as long as the applicants meet the requirements of 49 C.F.R. Part 383, as amended, and upon payment of the appropriate fee.
(c) (1) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, employees of farm-related service industries shall be exempt from the knowledge and skills tests required under this chapter and shall be issued restricted commercial driver’s licenses as long as the applicants meet the requirements of 49 C.F.R. Part 383, as amended, and upon payment of the appropriate fee.

“Farm-related service industries” shall include farm retail outlets and suppliers, agri-chemical businesses, custom harvesters, and livestock feeders.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 239

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1993, No. 9

, § 2, eff. April 23, 1993;

2005, No. 37

, § 4;

2013, No. 20

, § 1;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 253, 254.

§ 4108.
Commercial driver’s license, commercial learner’s permit qualification standards.

Before issuing a commercial driver’s license or commercial learner’s permit, the Commissioner shall request the applicant’s complete operating record from any state in which the applicant was previously licensed to operate any type of motor vehicle in the past 10 years and conduct a check of the applicant’s operating record by querying the National Driver Register established under 49 U.S.C. § 30302 and the Commercial Driver’s License Information System established under 49 U.S.C. § 31309 to determine if:

the applicant has already been issued a commercial driver’s license;

the applicant’s commercial driver’s license has been suspended, revoked, or canceled; or

the applicant has been convicted of any offense listed in

49 U.S.C. § 30304(a)

(3).

The Commissioner shall not issue a commercial driver’s license or commercial learner’s permit to any individual:

Under 21 years of age in the case of commercial driver’s licenses, except that individuals 18 years of age or older may obtain a commercial driver’s license that restricts the driver to operation solely within this State.
(1) (A) Under 21 years of age in the case of commercial driver’s licenses, except that individuals 18 years of age or older may obtain a commercial driver’s license that restricts the driver to operation solely within this State.

Under 18 years of age in the case of commercial learner’s permits.

Who, within three years of the license application and for initial applicants only, has been convicted of an offense listed in subsection 4116(a) of this title or a comparable offense in any jurisdiction, or convicted of an offense listed in

49 U.S.C. § 30304(a)

(3) in any jurisdiction.

Unless Vermont is the state of domicile of the individual and the individual has passed a knowledge and skills test for driving a commercial motor vehicle that complies with minimum federal standards established by federal regulation enumerated in 49 C.F.R. Part 383, subparts F, G, and H, as may be amended, and has satisfied all other requirements of 49 C.F.R. Part 380 and 49 U.S.C. Chapter 313, as may be amended, and the Anti-Drug Abuse Act of 1986, Pub. L. No. 99-570, Title XII (Commercial Motor Vehicle Safety Act of 1986), as may be amended, in addition to other requirements imposed by State law or federal regulation. The tests shall be prescribed and conducted by the Commissioner.

The Commissioner may authorize a person, including an agency of this or another state, an employer, a private driver training facility, or other private institution, or a department, agency, or instrumentality of local government, to administer the skills test specified by this section, provided:

the test is the same as would otherwise be administered by the State; and

the third party has entered into an agreement with this State that complies with requirements of 49 C.F.R. § 383.75.

At the discretion of the Commissioner, the knowledge test and the skills test required under 49 C.F.R. §§ 383.113 and 383.133, as amended, and the tests required for a passenger endorsement or a tank vehicle endorsement or a hazardous materials endorsement under 49 C.F.R. § 383.117, 383.119, or 383.121, as amended, may be waived for a commercial motor vehicle driver with military commercial motor vehicle experience who is currently licensed at the time of his or her application for a commercial driver’s license, if the test is substituted with an applicant’s driving record in combination with the driving experience specified in this subsection. The Commissioner shall impose conditions and limitations to restrict the applicants from whom alternative requirements for the skills test may be accepted. Such conditions shall include the following:

the applicant must certify that, during the two-year period immediately prior to applying for a commercial driver’s license, he or she:

has not had more than one license in addition to a military license;

has not had any license suspended, revoked, or cancelled;

has not had any convictions for any type of motor vehicle for the disqualifying offenses specified in subsection 4116(a) of this title;

has not had more than one conviction for any type of motor vehicle for serious traffic violations specified in subdivision 4103(16) of this title; and

has not had any conviction for a violation, other than a parking violation, of military, state, or local law relating to motor vehicle traffic control arising in connection with any crash, and has no record of a crash in which he or she was at fault; and

the applicant must provide evidence and certify that he or she:

is regularly employed or was regularly employed within the last 12 months in a military position requiring operation of a commercial motor vehicle;

was exempted from the commercial driver license requirements in 49 C.F.R. § 383.3(c); and

was operating for at least the two years immediately preceding discharge from the military a vehicle representative of the commercial motor vehicle the driver applicant operates or expects to operate.

Obtaining a commercial learner’s permit is a precondition to the initial issuance of a commercial driver’s license. The issuance of a commercial learner’s permit also is a precondition to the upgrade of a commercial driver’s license if the upgrade requires a skills test. A permit may be issued to an individual who holds a valid Vermont driver’s license who has passed the vision and written tests required for the class of license authorizing the operation of the type of vehicle for which the permit application is being made. A commercial learner’s permit holder is not eligible to take the commercial driver’s license skills test in the first 14 days after initial issuance of the commercial learner’s permit. A permit shall be issued for a period of one year, and only one renewal or reissuance of a commercial learner’s permit may be granted within a two-year period.

The fee for a knowledge test and the fee for a skills test shall each be $32.00. The fee for an endorsement test shall be $14.00. In the event that an applicant fails a test three times, he or she may not take the test again for at least six months. A fee of $24.00 shall be paid by the applicant before he or she may schedule a skills test. If an applicant does not appear for the scheduled skills test, the $24.00 scheduling fee is forfeited, unless the applicant has given the Department of Motor Vehicles at least 48 hours’ notice of cancellation of the test. If the applicant appears for the skills test, the $24.00 scheduling fee for that test will be used as part of the test fee. Use of an interpreter is prohibited during the administration of the knowledge or skills tests.

A commercial driver’s license or commercial learner’s permit may not be issued to an individual while the individual is subject to a disqualification from driving a commercial motor vehicle or while the individual’s driver’s license is suspended, revoked, or cancelled in any state. A driver’s license may not be issued to an individual who has a commercial driver’s license issued by any state unless the individual first surrenders all driver’s licenses issued by any state, which licenses shall be returned to the issuing states for cancellation.

An individual shall be entitled to take the test for a commercial driver’s license unless his or her driver’s license is, at the time of the requested test, suspended, revoked, cancelled, or disqualified in any other state.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 239

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1991, No. 88

, § 9;

1995, No. 47

, § 15, eff. April 20, 1995;

1999, No. 110

(Adj. Sess.), § 8;

2003, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 13, eff. June 8, 2004;

2009, No. 108

(Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. July 1, 2011;

2011, No. 128

(Adj. Sess.), § 23;

2013, No. 20

, § 1;

2015, No. 50

, § 27, eff. June 3, 2015;

2015, No. 159

(Adj. Sess.), § 54;

2017, No. 113

(Adj. Sess.), § 154;

2019, No. 60

, §§ 5, 6;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 254;

2021, No. 76

, §§ 25, 31.

§ 4109.
Nondomiciled commercial driver’s license; nondomiciled commercial learner’s permit.

The Commissioner may issue a nondomiciled commercial driver’s license or a nondomiciled commercial learner’s permit to an individual domiciled in a foreign jurisdiction if the Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administrator has determined that the commercial motor vehicle testing and licensing standards in the foreign jurisdiction do not meet the testing standards established in 49 C.F.R. Part 383. In addition, the Commissioner may issue a nondomiciled commercial driver’s license or a nondomiciled commercial learner’s permit to an individual domiciled in a state while that state is prohibited from issuing commercial driver’s licenses in accordance with 49 C.F.R. § 384.405. The word “nondomiciled” must appear on the face of the nondomiciled commercial driver’s license or nondomiciled commercial learner’s permit. An applicant shall surrender any nondomiciled commercial driver’s license or nondomiciled commercial learner’s permit issued by another state. Prior to issuing a nondomiciled commercial driver’s license or nondomiciled commercial learner’s permit, the Commissioner shall establish the practical capability of revoking or suspending the nondomiciled commercial driver’s license or nondomiciled commercial learner’s permit.

An applicant domiciled in a foreign jurisdiction must provide an unexpired employment authorization document (EAD) issued by the U.S. Citizenship and Immigration Services or an unexpired foreign passport accompanied by an approved I-94 form documenting the applicant’s most recent admittance into the United States. No proof of domicile is required.

An applicant for a nondomiciled commercial driver’s license or commercial learner’s permit is not required to surrender his or her foreign license.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 239

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2005, No. 166

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2013, No. 20

, § 1;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 254.

§ 4110.
Application for commercial driver’s license or commercial learner’s permit.

The application for a commercial driver’s license or commercial learner’s permit shall include the following:

The full name and current mailing and residential address of the applicant.

A physical description of the applicant, including sex, height, and weight.

The applicant’s date of birth and proof of age.

The applicant’s Social Security number, unless the application is for a nondomiciled commercial driver’s license or a nondomiciled commercial learner’s permit. The Commissioner must verify the name, date of birth, and Social Security number provided by the applicant with the information on file with the Social Security Administration. A commercial learner’s permit or commercial driver’s license may not be issued, renewed, or upgraded if data in the Social Security Administration database does not match the data provided by the applicant.

The applicant’s signature, as well as a space for the applicant to request that a “veteran” designation be placed on a commercial driver’s license. An applicant who requests a veteran designation shall provide a Department of Defense Form 214 or other proof of veteran status specified by the Commissioner.

Certifications that:

One of the following categories applies to the applicant:

Non-excepted interstate. He or she operates or expects to operate in interstate commerce, is both subject to and meets the qualification requirements of 49 C.F.R. Part 391, and is required to obtain a medical examiner’s certificate under 49 C.F.R. § 391.45.

Excepted interstate. He or she operates or expects to operate in interstate commerce, but engages exclusively in transportation or operations excepted under 49 C.F.R. § 390.3(f), 391.2, 391.68, or 398.3 from all or parts of the qualification requirements of 49 C.F.R. Part 391 and therefore is not required to obtain a medical examiner’s certificate by 49 C.F.R. § 391.45.

Non-excepted intrastate. He or she operates only in intrastate commerce and therefore is subject to state driver qualification requirements.

Excepted intrastate. He or she operates only in intrastate commerce, but engages exclusively in transportation or operations excepted from all or parts of the State’s driver qualification requirements.

The motor vehicle in which the applicant’s skills test will be taken is representative of the type of motor vehicle that the applicant operates or expects to operate.

The applicant is not subject to any disqualification under 49 C.F.R. § 383.51, or any license suspension, revocation, or cancellation under the law of any jurisdiction.

The applicant does not have a driver’s license from more than one state or jurisdiction.

For initial applicants only, the applicant has not been convicted of an offense listed in subsection 4116(a) of this title or a comparable offense in any jurisdiction, or an offense listed in

49 U.S.C. § 30304(a)

(3) in any jurisdiction within three years of the license application.

Any other information required by the Commissioner, including the names of all states where the applicant has been licensed to operate any type of motor vehicle during the previous 10 years.

The proper fee.

The four-year fee for a commercial driver’s license shall be $90.00. The two-year fee shall be $60.00. In those instances where the applicant surrenders a valid Vermont Class D license, the total fees due shall be reduced by:

one-quarter of the four-year fee established by section 601 of this title for each remaining full year of validity; or

one-half of the two-year fee paid for each remaining full year of validity.

The fee for a commercial learner’s permit is $15.00.

Proof of citizenship or lawful permanent residency as specified in Table 1 of 49 C.F.R. § 383.71.

Proof of compliance with the Transportation Security Administration requirements codified in 49 C.F.R. Part 1572 if the applicant is applying for a hazardous materials endorsement. A lawful permanent resident of the United States requesting a hazardous materials endorsement must additionally provide his or her U.S. Citizenship and Immigration Services alien registration number.

For an applicant who certifies that he or she will operate commercial motor vehicles in non-excepted interstate commerce, an original or a copy of a certificate prepared by a medical examiner. Certification status or “certified” will be posted in the Commercial Driver’s License Information System driver record for the driver.

When a licensee or permittee changes his or her name, mailing address, or residence or in the case of the loss, mutilation, or destruction of a license or permit, the licensee or permittee shall forthwith notify the Commissioner and apply in person for a duplicate license or permit in the same manner as set forth in subsection (a) of this section. The fee for a duplicate license or permit shall be $15.00.

An individual for whom Vermont has been his or her state of domicile for more than 30 days shall not drive a commercial motor vehicle under the authority of a commercial driver’s license or commercial learner’s permit issued by another jurisdiction.

[Repealed.]

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 239

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1991, No. 88

, § 10;

1995, No. 81

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2001, No. 102

(Adj. Sess.), § 33, eff. May 15, 2002;

2003, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 14;

2005, No. 37

, § 5;

2005, No. 175

(Adj. Sess.), § 39;

2009, No. 108

(Adj. Sess.), § 6, eff. July 1, 2011;

2009, No. 152

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2011, No. 128

(Adj. Sess.), § 24;

2013, No. 20

, § 1;

2013, No. 57

, § 30;

2015, No. 159

(Adj. Sess.), § 55;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 254.

§ 4110a.
Non-excepted interstate or intrastate status; certified medical status.

On or before January 30, 2014, every individual who holds a commercial learner’s permit or commercial driver’s license shall provide the Commissioner the certification required under subdivision 4110(a)(6)(A) of this title.

On or before January 30, 2014, existing holders of a commercial learner’s permit or commercial driver’s license who certify to non-excepted interstate driving operations shall provide the Commissioner with an original or a copy of a current medical examiner’s certificate. Certification status of “certified” will be posted on the Commercial Driver’s License Information System driver record for the driver. Failure to provide the Commissioner a current medical examiner’s certificate will result in the posting of “not-certified” status to the Commercial Driver’s License Information System driver record for the driver, and a commercial learner’s permit or commercial driver’s license downgrade shall be initiated.

To maintain a medical certification status of “certified,” the holder of a commercial driver’s license or commercial learner’s permit who certifies that he or she will operate commercial motor vehicles in non-excepted interstate commerce must provide the State an original or copy of each subsequently issued medical examiner’s certificate required under 49 C.F.R. Part 391.

HISTORY:

Added

2013, No. 20

, § 1; amended

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 254.

§ 4111.
Commercial driver’s license.

Contents of license. A commercial driver’s license shall be marked “commercial driver’s license” or “CDL” and shall be, to the maximum extent practicable, tamper proof and shall include the following information:

The name and residential address of the individual.

The individual’s color photograph or imaged likeness. An individual issued a license under this subsection may renew the license not earlier than six months prior to its expiration date. In such case, the prior license document shall be surrendered. The renewed license shall be effective from the date of issuance to the end of the period for which it is renewed.

A physical description of the individual, including sex, height, and weight.

Date of birth.

Any number or identifier deemed appropriate by the Commissioner.

The individual’s signature.

The class or type of commercial motor vehicle or vehicles that the individual is authorized to drive together with any endorsements or restrictions.

The name of this State.

The dates between which the license is valid.

[Repealed.]

An indicator that a licensee has executed a document that serves as an anatomical gift pursuant to section 618a of this title.

A veteran designation if a veteran, as defined in 38 U.S.C. § 101(2), requests the designation and provides proof of veteran status as specified in subdivision 4110(a)(5) of this title, and if the Office of Veterans Affairs confirms his or her status as an honorably discharged veteran or a veteran discharged under honorable conditions.

Classifications, endorsements, and restrictions. Driver’s licenses may be issued with the following classifications, endorsements, and restrictions:

Licensees may drive all vehicles in the class for which the license is issued and all lesser classes of vehicles, except those requiring special endorsements.

Class A—Any combination of vehicles with a gross vehicle weight rating of 26,001 pounds or more, provided the gross vehicle weight rating of the vehicle being towed is in excess of 10,000 pounds.

Class B—Any single vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating of 26,001 pounds or more, and any such vehicle towing a vehicle not in excess of 10,000 pounds.

Class C—Any single vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating of less than 26,001 pounds or any such vehicle towing a vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating not in excess of 10,000 pounds comprising:

vehicles designed to transport 16 or more passengers, including the driver; and

vehicles used in the transportation of hazardous materials which requires the vehicle to be placarded under 49 C.F.R., part 172, subpart F.

Class D—Any single vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating of less than 26,001 pounds or any such vehicle towing a vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating not in excess of 10,000 pounds, except vehicles included in Class C or vehicles that require a special endorsement unless the proper endorsement appears on the license. Class D licenses shall not be commercial driver’s licenses.

Licenses may be issued with appropriate endorsements and restrictions noted thereon. The Commissioner shall determine the manner of notation.

[Repealed.]

Within 10 days after issuing a commercial driver’s license, the Commissioner shall notify the Commercial Driver’s License Information System of that fact, providing all information required to ensure identification of the individual.

The commercial driver’s license shall expire in the same manner as set by section 601 of this title.

When applying for renewal of a commercial driver’s license, the applicant shall complete the application form required by section 4110 of this title, providing updated information and required certifications. If the applicant wishes to retain a hazardous materials endorsement, the written test for a hazardous materials endorsement must be taken and passed. In addition, the applicant must successfully complete the security threat assessment required by 49 C.F.R. Part 1572. Within 15 days after an adverse initial or final determination of threat assessment being served by the U.S. Transportation Security Administration, the applicant’s hazardous materials endorsement shall be revoked or denied.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 239

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1993, No. 122

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2003, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 15;

2005, No. 37

, § 6;

2005, No. 166

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

2007, No. 153

(Adj. Sess.), § 41;

2007, No. 188

(Adj. Sess.), § 6;

2009, No. 39

, § 15;

2009, No. 108

(Adj. Sess.), § 7, eff. July 1, 2011;

2009, No. 152

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. July 1, 2011;

2013, No. 20

, § 1;

2013, No. 57

, § 31;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 254.